Nebraska, session 109, LB1005.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1005 LB1005
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 60-6,356, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
60-6,356 (1) An all-terrain vehicle or a utility-type vehicle shall
not be operated on any controlled-access highway with more than two
marked traffic lanes. The crossing of any controlled-access highway with
more than two marked traffic lanes shall not be permitted except as
provided in subsections (9) and (10) of this section. Subsections (2),
(3), and (5) through (8) of this section authorize and apply to operation
of an all-terrain vehicle or a utility-type vehicle only on a highway
other than a controlled-access highway with more than two marked traffic
lanes.
(2) An all-terrain vehicle or a utility-type vehicle may be operated
in accordance with the operating requirements of subsection (3) of this
section:
(a) Outside the corporate limits of a city, village, or
unincorporated village if incidental to the vehicle's use for
agricultural purposes;
(b) Within the corporate limits of a city or village if authorized
by the city or village by ordinance adopted in accordance with this
section; or
(c) Within an unincorporated village if authorized by the county
board of the county in which the unincorporated village is located by
resolution in accordance with this section.
(3)(a) An all-terrain vehicle or a utility-type vehicle may be
operated as authorized in subsection (2) of this section when such
operation occurs:
(i) Between the hours of sunrise and sunset; or
(ii) Between the hours of sunset and sunrise for purposes of snow
removal within the corporate limits of a city or village or within an
unincorporated village; or .
(iii) Between the hours of sunset and sunrise within the corporate
-2-

LB1005 LB1005
2026 2026
limits of a city or village or within an unincorporated village if:
(A) The headlight for the all-terrain vehicle or utility-type
vehicle displays a white light and:
(I) For multiple beam headlights, the upper beam sufficiently
illuminates any person, vehicle, or substantial object at a distance of
at least one hundred feet in front of the all-terrain vehicle or utility-
type vehicle, and the lowermost beam sufficiently illuminates any person,
vehicle, or substantial object at a distance of at least fifty feet in
front of the all-terrain vehicle or utility-type vehicle; and
(II) For single beam headlights, the headlight sufficiently
illuminates any person, vehicle, or substantial object at a distance of
at least one hundred feet in front of the all-terrain vehicle or utility-
type vehicle, and the high intensity portion of the light does not
project higher than the level of the center of the headlight; and
(B) The taillight for the all-terrain vehicle or utility-type
vehicle displays a red light that is plainly visible from a distance of
five hundred feet behind the all-terrain vehicle or utility-type vehicle.
(b) Any person operating an all-terrain vehicle or a utility-type
vehicle as authorized in subsection (2) of this section shall:
(i) Have a valid Class O operator's license or a farm permit as
provided in section 60-4,126;
(ii) Have liability insurance coverage for the all-terrain vehicle
or a utility-type vehicle while operating such all-terrain vehicle or
utility-type vehicle on a highway; and
(iii) Not operate the all-terrain or utility-type vehicle at a speed
in excess of thirty miles per hour.
(c) The person operating an all-terrain vehicle or a utility-type
vehicle shall provide proof of such insurance coverage to any peace
officer requesting such proof within five days of such a request.
(d) When operating an all-terrain vehicle or a utility-type vehicle
as authorized in subsection (2) of this section, the headlight and
-3-

LB1005 LB1005
2026 2026
taillight of the vehicle shall be on and the vehicle shall be equipped
with a bicycle safety flag which extends not less than five feet above
ground attached to the rear of such vehicle. The bicycle safety flag
shall be triangular in shape with an area of not less than thirty square
inches and shall be day-glow in color.
(4) All-terrain vehicles and utility-type vehicles may be operated
without complying with subsection (3) of this section on highways in
parades which have been authorized by the State of Nebraska or any
department, board, commission, or political subdivision of the state.
(5) The crossing of a highway other than a controlled-access highway
with more than two marked traffic lanes shall be permitted by an all-
terrain vehicle or a utility-type vehicle without complying with
subsection (3) of this section only if:
(a) The crossing is made at an angle of approximately ninety degrees
to the direction of the highway and at a place where no obstruction
prevents a quick and safe crossing;
(b) The vehicle is brought to a complete stop before crossing the
shoulder or roadway of the highway;
(c) The operator yields the right-of-way to all oncoming traffic
that constitutes an immediate potential hazard;
(d) In crossing a divided highway, the crossing is made only at an
intersection of such highway with another highway; and
(e) Both the headlight and taillight of the vehicle are on when the
crossing is made.
(6) All-terrain vehicles and utility-type vehicles may be operated
outside the corporate limits of any municipality by electric utility
personnel within the course of their employment in accordance with the
operation requirements of subsection (3) of this section, except that the
operation of the vehicle pursuant to this subsection need not be limited
to the hours between sunrise and sunset.
(7) A city or village may adopt an ordinance authorizing the
-4-

LB1005 LB1005
2026 2026
operation of all-terrain vehicles and utility-type vehicles within the
corporate limits of the city or village if the operation is in accordance
with subsection (3) of this section. The city or village may place other
restrictions on the operation of all-terrain vehicles and utility-type
vehicles within its corporate limits.
(8) A county board may adopt a resolution authorizing the operation
of all-terrain vehicles and utility-type vehicles within any
unincorporated village within the county if the operation is in
accordance with subsection (3) of this section. The county may place
other restrictions on the operation of all-terrain vehicles and utility-
type vehicles within the unincorporated village.
(9) Except as provided in subsection (10) of this section, the
crossing of a controlled-access highway with more than two marked traffic
lanes shall be permitted by a utility-type vehicle if the operation is in
accordance with the operation requirements of subsection (3) of this
section and if the following requirements are met:
(a) The crossing is made at an intersection that:
(i) Is controlled by a traffic control signal; or
(ii) For any intersection located outside the corporate limits of a
city or village, is controlled by stop signs;
(b) The crossing at such intersection is made in compliance with the
traffic control signal or stop signs; and
(c) The crossing at such intersection is specifically authorized as
follows:
(i) If such intersection is located within the corporate limits of a
city or village, by ordinance of such city or village;
(ii) If such intersection is located within an unincorporated
village, by resolution of the county board of the county in which such
unincorporated village is located; or
(iii) If such intersection is located outside the corporate limits
of a city or village and outside any unincorporated village, by
-5-

LB1005 LB1005
2026 2026
resolution of the county board of the county in which such intersection
is located.
(10) When the use of the all-terrain vehicle or utility-type vehicle
is for an agricultural purpose, the crossing of a controlled-access
highway with more than two marked traffic lanes shall be permitted if
such vehicle is operated in accordance with subsection (3) of this
section.
Sec. 2. Original section 60-6,356, Revised Statutes Supplement,
2025, is repealed.
-6-